Utah statutes.
53-3-702.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Citation" means a summons, ticket, or other official document issued by a peace officer for a traffic violation, containing an order that requires the motorist to respond.

(2)  "Collateral" means cash or other security deposited to secure an appearance for trial, following the issuance by a peace officer of a citation for a traffic violation.

(3)  "Court" means a court of law or traffic tribunal.

(4)  "Driver license" means a license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle issued under the laws of the home jurisdiction.

(5)  "Home jurisdiction" means the jurisdiction that issued the driver's license of the traffic violator.

(6)  "Issuing jurisdiction" means the jurisdiction in which the traffic citation was issued to the motorist.

(7)  "Jurisdiction" means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

(8)  "Motorist" means a driver of a motor vehicle operating in a party jurisdiction other than the home jurisdiction.

(9)  "Personal recognizance" means an agreement by a motorist made at the time of issuance of the traffic citation that he will comply with the terms of that traffic citation.

(10)  "Terms of the citation" means those options expressly stated upon the citation.



Amended by Chapter 282, 1998 General Session

